Washington statutes.
RCW 43.24.060

Examinations—Committees—Duties, compensation, travel expenses.

(1) The director of licensing shall, from time to time, fix such times and places for holding examinations of applicants as may be convenient, and adopt general rules and regulations prescribing the method of conducting examinations.

The governor, from time to time, upon the request of the director of licensing, shall appoint examining committees, composed of three persons possessing the qualifications provided by law to conduct examinations of applicants for licenses to practice the respective professions or callings for which licenses are required.

The committees shall prepare the necessary lists of examination questions, conduct the examinations, which may be either oral or written, or partly oral and partly written, and shall make and file with the director of licensing lists, signed by all the members conducting the examination, showing the names and addresses of all applicants for licenses who have successfully passed the examination, and showing separately the names and addresses of the applicants who have failed to pass the examination, together with all examination questions and the written answers thereto submitted by the applicants.

Each member of a committee shall receive twenty-five dollars per day for each day spent in conducting the examination and in going to and returning from the place of examination, and travel expenses, in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(2) The director of licensing may appoint advisory committees to advise the department regarding the preparation of examinations for professional licensing and such other specific aspects of regulating the professions within the jurisdiction of the department as the director may designate. Such a committee and its members shall serve at the pleasure of the director.

Each member of an advisory committee shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall receive reimbursement for travel expenses incurred in attending meetings of the committee in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 1984 c 287 s 78; 1982 c 227 s 15; 1979 c 158 s 98; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 105; 1965 c 100 s 3; 1965 c 8 s 43.24.060. Prior: 1921 c 7 s 99; RRS s 10857.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—1982 c 227: See note following RCW 19.09.100.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.